District of Columbia statutes.
38-2907

Education costs excluded from the Formula payments.

(a)

The cost of transportation for students with disabilities, tuition payments for private placements for students with disabilities, and the cost of performing state education functions for the District of Columbia are not covered by the Formula and shall be allocated by the Mayor and Council to the Office of the State Superintendent of Education (“OSSE”), or to another agency as considered appropriate by the Mayor, in addition to the amount generated by the Formula.

(b)

The OSSE, as the state education agency for the District of Columbia, shall perform all state education functions for public charter schools and for DCPS, which are local education agencies.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-207, § 108, 45 DCR 8095
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 57(b), 53 DCR 6198
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 172(d), 56 DCR 1117
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 4002(e), 57 DCR 181
1981 Ed., § 31-2907.
D.C. Law 16-305, in subsec. (a), substituted “students with disabilities” for “handicapped students”.
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in subsec. (a).
D.C. Law 18-111 rewrote the section.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2901.
For temporary addition of chapter, see note to § 31-2901.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(e) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-187, August 26, 2009, 56 DCR 7374).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(e) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(e) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).